Florida, session 2026, HB1039.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
45
46 Section 1. Section 215.987, Florida Statutes, is created
47 to read:
48 215.987 State cryptocurrency reserve fund.—
49 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
50 (a) "Airdrop" means a gratuitous distribution of
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
51 cryptocurrency to users of a blockchain or protocol, generally
52 made in a broad, equitable, and nondiscretionary manner.
53 (b) "Blockchain" means a mathematically secured,
54 chronological, decentralized, distributed, and digital ledger or
55 database that consists of records of transactions that cannot be
56 altered retroactively.
57 (c) "Board" means the State Board of Administration.
58 (d) "Committee" means the Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency
59 Reserve Fund Advisory Committee established in this section.
60 (e) "Cryptocurrency" means a virtual currency that is not
61 issued by any central authority, is designed to function as a
62 medium of exchange, and uses encryption technology to regulate
63 the generation of units of currency, to verify fund transfers,
64 and to prevent counterfeiting.
65 (f) "Distributed ledger" means technology in which data is
66 shared across a network that creates a public digital ledger of
67 verified transactions or information among network participants
68 and cryptography is used to link the data to maintain the
69 integrity of the public ledger and execute other functions.
70 (g) "Fork" means a change to the protocol of a distributed
71 ledger system which creates a separate ledger, which may result
72 in a new cryptocurrency that shares a common transaction history
73 with the previous cryptocurrency up to the point of change.
74 (h) "Governmental entity" has the same meaning as in s.
75 215.986(1).
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
76 (i) "Private key" means a unique element of cryptographic
77 data used for signing transactions on blockchain.
78 (j) "Qualified custodian" means a state or federally
79 chartered financial institution or other entity regulated by
80 this state which is authorized to have custody of virtual
81 currencies on behalf of its clients.
82 (k) "Qualified liquidity provider" means an entity that
83 meets all of the following requirements:
84 1. Is licensed or regulated under applicable federal or
85 state law.
86 2. Maintains audited financial statements prepared by a
87 regulated auditor.
88 3. Has at least 5 years of experience trading in the
89 digital assets industry.
90 4. Maintains an office and has registered principal in
91 this state.
92 5. Has certified in a manner prescribed by the board that
93 the provider meets the requirements of subparagraphs 1.-4.
94 (l) "Reserve" means the Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency
95 Reserve Fund established in this section.
96 (m) "Secure custody solution" means a technological
97 product or blended product and service meeting all of the
98 following criteria:
99 1. The cryptographic private keys are:
100 a. Exclusively known by and accessible to the governmental
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
101 entity or the qualified custodian.
102 b. Contained within an encrypted, hardware-secured
103 environment and used only to sign and authorize cryptocurrency
104 transactions through end-to-end encrypted channels.
105 c. Never stored on or accessible through a smartphone.
106 2. The hardware containing the cryptographic private keys
107 is maintained in a secure data center. As used in this
108 subparagraph, the term "secure data center" means a physical
109 facility that maintains third-party certifications, uses
110 certified cryptographic hardware, enforces physical and
111 environmental security, and ensures logical isolation.
112 3. A multiparty governance structure for authorizing
113 transactions is implemented, user access control is enforced,
114 and all user-initiated actions are logged. A smartphone may be
115 used, but only to authenticate authorized users of the secure
116 custody solution, including through biometric authentication.
117 4. The provider of the technological product or blended
118 product and service has implemented a disaster recovery protocol
119 ensuring state access to assets if the provider becomes
120 unavailable.
121 5. The technological product or blended product and
122 service undergoes regular code audits and penetration testing,
123 with identified vulnerabilities promptly addressed.
124 (2) ESTABLISHMENT; ADMINISTRATION.—
125 (a) The Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency Reserve Fund is
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
126 established as a special fund assigned to the board. The
127 objective of the reserve is to grow the reserve as much as
128 possible to ensure the long-term financial sovereignty of this
129 state. The board has custody of and shall administer and manage
130 the reserve. The reserve consists of:
131 1. Money transferred or deposited to the credit of the
132 reserve by legislative appropriation.
133 2. Revenue that the Legislature by general law dedicates
134 for deposit to the credit of the reserve.
135 3. Cryptocurrency purchased using money in or received by
136 the reserve, including:
137 a. Cryptocurrency derived from the fork of a distributed
138 ledger, the retention of which has been approved by the board;
139 or
140 b. Cryptocurrency distributed pursuant to an airdrop to
141 this state's cryptocurrency addresses, the retention of which
142 has been approved by the board.
143 4. Investment earnings and interest or rewards earned on
144 assets in the reserve.
145 (b) To administer and manage the reserve, the board may
146 acquire, exchange, sell, supervise, manage, or retain authorized
147 investments that a prudent investor exercising reasonable care,
148 skill, and caution would acquire, exchange, sell, supervise,
149 manage, or retain in light of the objective of the reserve,
150 taking into consideration the investment of all the assets of
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
151 the reserve rather than a single investment.
152 (c) The Legislature may appropriate funds for deposit to
153 the credit of the reserve for the purposes of:
154 1. Investing in cryptocurrency.
155 2. Administering and managing the reserve.
156 (d) The board may spend cryptocurrency in the reserve or
157 use the net proceed from the sale of cryptocurrency in the
158 reserve to pay the reasonable costs associated with
159 administering and managing the reserve. Costs and fees of the
160 board for investment services shall be deducted from the
161 reserve.
162 (e) The board may transfer money in the reserve to the
163 State Treasury only when authorized by the Legislature in the
164 General Appropriations Act or other law.
165 (f) Cryptocurrency received by the reserve which is not
166 compliant with applicable federal or state law may be disposed
167 of by the board in accordance with applicable law.
168 (3) MARKET CAPITALIZATION REQUIREMENT.—To be eligible to
169 be purchased for the reserve, a cryptocurrency must have an
170 average market capitalization of at least $100 billion over the
171 most recent 12-month period.
172 (4) THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTS AND PERMISSIBLE TRANSACTIONS;
173 AUDITS.—
174 (a) The board may contract with one or more third-party
175 entities for the administration or management of the reserve,
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
176 including:
177 1. A technology provider of a secure custody solution.
178 2. A qualified custodian that uses a secure custody
179 solution.
180 3. A qualified liquidity provider to facilitate the
181 purchase and sale of assets in the reserve.
182 (b) If the board determines it is in the best interest of
183 the reserve, the board may use derivatives.
184 (c) The board may contract with a certified public
185 accountant to perform an independent audit of the reserve.
186 (5) FLORIDA STRATEGIC CRYPTOCURRENCY RESERVE FUND ADVISORY
187 COMMITTEE.—
188 (a) There is established the Florida Strategic
189 Cryptocurrency Reserve Fund Advisory Committee within the board.
190 (b) The committee shall be composed of the following five
191 members as a resource to the board of trustees of the board,
192 subject to confirmation by the Senate, as follows:
193 1. The executive director of the board, who shall serve as
194 chair.
195 2. Three members appointed by the board with expertise in
196 cryptocurrency investments.
197 3. One member appointed by the board with expertise in
198 digital asset security.
199 (c) The committee shall advise the board regarding the
200 administration and management of the reserve, including:
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
201 1. Recommendations for valuing assets in the reserve.
202 2. The establishment of prudent investment policies
203 relating to the investment objectives of and asset allocation in
204 the reserve.
205 3. Recommendations for the establishment of prudent
206 custody and security policies for the reserve.
207 (d) A member of the committee is not entitled to receive
208 compensation for service on the committee.
209 (e) Appointed members shall serve for 4-year terms. A
210 vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term
211 in the same manner as the original appointment.
212 (6) NO PRIVATE CAUSE OF ACTION.—This section does not
213 create a private cause of action related to compliance with the
214 requirements of this section.
215 (7) RULEMAKING.—The board shall adopt rules as necessary
216 to administer the Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency Reserve Fund.
217 Section 2. Paragraph (g) is added to subsection (5) of
218 section 215.44, Florida Statutes, to read:
219 215.44 Board of Administration; powers and duties in
220 relation to investment of trust funds.—
221 (5) On or before January 1 of each year, the board shall
222 provide to the Legislature a report including the following
223 items for each fund which, by law, has been entrusted to the
224 board for investment:
225 (g) With respect to the Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1039 2026
226 Reserve Fund, the following information:
227 1. The amount of cryptocurrency held in the reserve on the
228 last day of the preceding fiscal year.
229 2. An estimate of the monetary value of the cryptocurrency
230 held in the reserve on the last day of the preceding fiscal
231 year.
232 3. Any changes in the amount and estimated monetary value
233 of cryptocurrency in the reserve during the period the
234 cryptocurrency has been held in the reserve, disaggregated by
235 the cryptocurrency type.
236 4. A description of the actions taken by the board to
237 administer and manage the reserve during the preceding fiscal
238 year.
239 Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1039-02-c2